Utah statutes.
17-53-204.   Meetings -- At county seat -- Exception.

(1) (a)  The county legislative body shall provide by ordinance for the holding of regular meetings of the county legislative body.

(b)  The county legislative body may cancel a regular meeting as the county legislative body considers appropriate.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), each regular meeting of the county legislative body shall be held at the county seat.

(b)  If approved by a vote of the county legislative body, a county legislative body may hold an occasional meeting outside the county seat as the public business requires.

